California statutes. Revenue and Taxation Code
 institution, to be effective, the notice shall state the amount due from the taxpayer and shall be delivered or mailed to the branch or office of the financial institution where the credits or other property is held, unless another branch or office is designated by the financial institution to receive the notice.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1999, Ch. 991, Sec. 60.   Effective January 1, 2000.   Operative July 1, 2001, by Sec. 75 of Ch. 991.)
-------------------------------------------

11453.

(a) Notwithstanding Article 7 (commencing with Section 706.151) of Chapter 5 of Division 2 of Title 9 of Part 2 of the Code of Civil Procedure, if the board determines upon receiving information from a person liable for any amount under this part that the person’s employer withheld earnings for taxes pursuant to Section 11452 and failed to remit the withheld earnings to the board, the employer shall be liable for the amount not remitted. The board’s determination shall be based on payroll documents or other substantiating evidence
 furnished by the person liable for the tax.

(b) Upon its determination, the board shall mail notice to the employer at its last known address that upon failure to remit the withheld earnings to the board within 15 days of the date of its notice to the employer, the employer shall be liable for that amount which was withheld and not remitted.

(c) If the employer fails to remit the amount withheld to the board upon notice, that amount for which the employer is liable shall be determined, collected, and paid as though it were a tax deficiency. The amount may be assessed at any time prior to seven years from the first day that the unremitted amount, in the aggregate, was first withheld. Interest shall accrue on that amount from the first day that the unremitted amount, in the aggregate, was first withheld.

(d) When the
 determination against the employer is final and due and payable, the person’s account shall be immediately credited with an amount equal to that determined amount as though it were a payment received by the board on the first date that the unremitted amount, in the aggregate, was first withheld by the employer.

(e) Collection against the person liable for the tax is stayed for both the following amount and period:

(1) An amount equal to the amount determined by the board under subdivision (a).

(2) The earlier of the time the credit is applied to the person’s account pursuant to subdivision (d) or the determination against the employer is withdrawn or revised and the person is notified by the board thereof.

(f) If under this section an amount that was
 withheld and not remitted to the board is final and due and payable by the employer and credited to the person’s account, this remedy shall be the exclusive remedy for the person to recover that amount from the employer.

(g) This section shall apply to determinations made by the board on or after the effective date of the act adding this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 1052, Sec. 20.5.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Suit for Tax [11471. - 11475.]

11471.

At any time within four years after any tax or any amount of tax required to be collected becomes due and payable and at any time within four years after the delinquency of any tax or any amount of tax required to be collected, or within the period during which a lien is in force as the result of the recording or filing of a notice of state tax lien under Section 7171 of the Government Code, the board may bring an action in the courts of this state, of any other state, or of the United States in the name of the people of the State of California to collect the
 amount delinquent together with penalties and interest.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 695, Sec. 7.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

11472.

The Attorney General shall prosecute the action, and the provisions of the Code of Civil Procedure relating to service of summons, pleadings, proofs, trials, and appeals are applicable to the proceedings.

(History: Added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 695, Sec. 8.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

11473.

In the action a writ of attachment may be issued in the manner provided by Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 485.010) of Title 6.5 of Part 2 of the Code of Civil Procedure without the showing required by Section 485.010 of the Code of Civil Procedure.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 11472 by Stats. 1998, Ch. 695, Sec. 9.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

11474.

In the action a certificate by the board showing the delinquency shall be prima facie evidence of the levy of the tax, of the delinquency of the amount of tax, interest, and penalties set forth in the certificate, and of compliance by the board with all provisions of this part in relation to the assessment of the property and computation and levy of the tax.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 11473 by Stats. 1998, Ch. 695, Sec. 10.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

11475.

In any action brought under this part, process may be served according to the Code of Civil Procedure and the Civil Code or may be served upon any agent or clerk in this state employed by any private railroad car company in a place of business maintained by the private railroad car company in this state. In the latter case, a copy of the process shall be sent by registered mail to the private railroad car company at its principal or home office.

(History: Added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 695, Sec. 11.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Lien of Tax [11491. - 11496.]

11491.

The tax, together with the interest and penalties thereon, constitutes a lien upon, and has the effect of an execution duly levied against, all private cars and other personal property, belonging to or owned by the person against whom the tax is levied, and a lien upon all real property of said person as provided in Section 11495.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1947, Ch. 860.)
-------------------------------------------

11492.

The lien upon personal property created by this part attaches as of 12:01 a.m. on the first day of January of each year with respect to taxes, together with the interest and penalties thereon, to be levied during the year.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1982, Ch. 939, Sec. 2.   Operative January 1, 1984, by Sec. 3 of Ch. 939.)
-------------------------------------------

11493.

The lien upon personal property shall not be removed until the tax, interest, and penalties are paid, or the property subject to the lien is sold in payment of the tax, interest, and penalties.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1947, Ch. 860.)
-------------------------------------------

11494.

The lien upon personal property is paramount to all private liens or encumbrances of whatever character, and to the rights of any conditional vendor or other holder of the legal title, in or to any private car assessed under this part.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1947, Ch. 860.)
-------------------------------------------

11495.

If any amount required to be paid to the state under this part is not paid when due, the board may within four years after the amount is due file for record in the office of any county recorder a certificate specifying the amount, interest, and penalty due, the name and address as it appears on the records of the board of the person liable for the same, and the fact that the board has complied with all provisions of this part in the determination of the amount required to be paid. From the time of the filing for record, the amount required to be paid together with interest and penalty constitutes a lien upon all real property in the county owned by the person or
 afterwards and before the lien expires acquired by him. The lien has the force, effect, and priority of a judgment lien and shall continue for 10 years from the time of the filing of the certificate unless sooner released or otherwise discharged. The lien may, within 10 years from the date of the filing of the certificate or within 10 years from the date of the last extension of the lien in the manner herein provided, be extended by filing for record a new certificate in the office of the county recorder of any county and from the time of such filing the lien shall be extended to the real property in such county for 10 years unless sooner released or otherwise discharged.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1974, Ch. 54.)
-------------------------------------------

11496.

The board may at any time release all or any portion of the property subject to any lien provided for in this part from the lien or subordinate the lien to other liens and encumbrances if it determines that the amount, interest, and penalties are sufficiently secured by a lien on other property or that the release or subordination of the lien will not jeopardize the collection of the amount, interest, and penalties.

(History: Added by Stats. 1947, Ch. 860.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Warrant for Collection of Tax [11501. - 11503.]

11501.

At any time within four years after any person is delinquent in the payment of any amount herein required to be paid, or within 10 years after the last recording of an abstract under Section 11495 or the last recording or filing of a notice of state tax lien under Section 7171 of the Government Code, the board or its authorized representative may issue a warrant for the enforcement of any liens and for the collection of any amount required to be paid to the state under this part. The warrant shall be directed to any sheriff or marshal and shall have the
 same effect as a writ of execution. The warrant shall be levied and sale made pursuant to it in the same manner and with the same effect as a levy of and a sale pursuant to a writ of execution.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 872, Sec. 147.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

11502.

The board may pay or advance to the sheriff or marshal, the same fees, commissions, and expenses for his or her services as are provided by law for similar services pursuant to a writ of execution. The board, and not the court, shall approve the fees for publication in a newspaper.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 872, Sec. 148.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

11503.

The fees, commissions, and expenses are the obligation of the person required to pay any amount under this part and may be collected from him or her by virtue of the warrant or in any other manner provided in this part for the collection of the tax.

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 498, Sec. 18.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Seizure and Sale [11511. - 11514.]

11511.

At any time within four years after any person is delinquent in the payment of any amount, the board may forthwith collect the amount by its seizure of any property, real or personal, of the person and its sale of that property, or a sufficient part of it, at public auction to pay the amount due together with any interest or penalties imposed for the delinquency and any costs incurred on account of the seizure and sale.

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 498, Sec. 19.)
-------------------------------------------

11512.

Notice of the sale and the time and place thereof shall be given to the delinquent person and to all persons who have an interest of record in writing at least 20 days before the date set for the sale in the following manner: The notice shall be personally served or enclosed in an envelope addressed to the taxpayer or other person at his or her last known address or place of business in this state. If not personally served, the notice shall be deposited in the United States mail, postage prepaid. The notice shall be published pursuant to Section 6063 of the Government Code, in a newspaper of general circulation published in the city in which the
 property or a part thereof is situated if any part thereof is situated in a city or, if not, in a newspaper of general circulation published in the county in which the property or a part thereof is located. Notice shall also be posted in both of the following manners:

(a) One public place in the city in which the interest in property is to be sold if it is to be sold in a city or, if not to be sold in a city, one public place in the county in which the interest in the property is to be sold.

(b) One conspicuous place on the property.

The notice shall contain a description of the property to be sold, a statement of the amount due, including taxes, interest, penalties, and costs, the name of the delinquent, and the further statement that unless the amount due is paid on or before the time fixed in the notice for the sale, the property, or
 so much of it as may be necessary, will be sold in accordance with law and the notice.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1528, Sec. 11.)
-------------------------------------------

11513.

At the sale the board shall sell the property in accordance with law and the notice, and shall deliver to the purchaser a bill of sale for the personal property and a deed for any real property sold. The bill of sale or deed vests the interest or title of the person liable for the amount in the purchaser. The unsold portion of any property seized may be left at the place of sale at the risk of the person liable for the amount.

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 498, Sec. 19.)
-------------------------------------------

11514.

If upon the sale the moneys received exceed the total of all amounts, including interest, penalties, and costs due the state, the board shall return the excess to the person liable for the amounts and obtain that person’s receipt. If any person having an interest in or lien upon the property files with the board prior to the sale notice of his or her interest or lien, the board shall withhold any excess pending a determination of the rights of the respective parties thereto by a court of competent jurisdiction. If for any reason the receipt of the person liable for the amount is not available, the board shall deposit the excess moneys with the
 Treasurer, as trustee for the owner, subject to the order of the person liable for the amount, or that person’s heirs, successors, or assigns.

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 498, Sec. 19.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 6. Payment on Termination of Business and Successor’s Liability [11521. - 11524.]

11521.

If any person liable for any amount under this part sells his or her business or quits the business, the person’s successors or assigns shall withhold a sufficient amount of the purchase price to cover the amount due until the former owner produces a receipt from the board showing that it has been paid or a certificate stating that no amount is due.

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 498, Sec. 20.)
-------------------------------------------

11522.

If the purchaser of a business fails to withhold a sufficient amount of the purchase price as required, the purchaser becomes personally liable for the payment of the amount required to be withheld by him or her to the extent of the purchase price, valued in money. Within 60 days after receiving a written request from the purchaser for a certificate, or within 60 days from the date the former owner’s records are made available for audit, whichever period expires later, but in any event not later than 90 days after receiving the request, or 90 days from the date of the sale of the business, whichever period expires later,
 the board shall either issue the certificate or mail notice to the purchaser, at his or her address as it appears on the records of the board, of the amount that must be paid as a condition of issuing the certificate. Failure of the board to mail the notice will release the purchaser from any further obligation to withhold from the purchase price as provided in this article. The last date upon which the obligation of the successor may be enforced shall be not later than three years after the date the board is notified of the purchase of the business.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1991, Ch. 236, Sec. 14.   Effective July 29, 1991.)
-------------------------------------------

11523.

The certificate may be issued after the payment of all amounts due under this part, according to the records of the board as of the date of the certificate, or after the payment of the amounts is secured to the satisfaction of the board.

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 498, Sec. 20.)
-------------------------------------------

11524.

The obligation of the successor shall be enforced by serving a notice of successor liability on the person. The notice shall be served in the manner prescribed for service of a notice of assessment, not later than three years after the date the board is notified of the purchase of the business. The successor may petition for reconsideration in the manner provided in Article 5 (commencing with Section 11336) of Chapter 2. The notice shall become final and the amount due and payable in the manner provided in that article except that no additional penalty shall apply if not paid when due and payable. The provisions of this
 chapter with respect to the collection of any amount required to be paid under this part shall apply when the notice becomes final.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1991, Ch. 236, Sec. 15.   Effective July 29, 1991.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 7. Miscellaneous Provisions [11531. - 11534.]

11531.

The remedies of the state provided for in this chapter are cumulative, and no action taken by the board or Attorney General constitutes an election by the state to pursue any remedy to the exclusion of any other remedy for which provision is made in this part.

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 498, Sec. 21.)
-------------------------------------------

11532.

In all proceedings under this chapter the board may act on behalf of the people of the State of California.

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 498, Sec. 21.)
-------------------------------------------

11533.

(a) Upon termination, dissolution, or abandonment of a corporate business, any officer or other person who has control or supervision of or is charged with the responsibility for the filing of returns or the payment of tax, or who is under a duty to act for the corporation in complying with any requirement of this part, shall be personally liable for any unpaid taxes and interest and penalties on those taxes, if that officer or other person willfully fails to pay or to cause to be paid any taxes due from the corporation pursuant to this part.

(b) The officer or other
 person shall be liable only for taxes which became due during the period he or she had the control, supervision, responsibility, or duty to act for the corporation described in subdivision (a), plus interest and penalties on those taxes.

(c) For purposes of this section, “willfully fails to pay or cause to be paid” means that the failure was the result of an intentional, conscious, and voluntary course of action.

(d) The sum due for the liability under this section may be collected by determination and collection in the manner provided in Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 11251) and Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 11401).

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 498, Sec. 21.)
-------------------------------------------

11534.

(a) A collection cost recovery fee shall be imposed on any person that fails to pay an amount of tax, interest, penalty, or other amount due and payable under this part. The collection cost recovery fee shall be in an amount equal to the board’s costs for collection, as reasonably determined by the board. The collection cost recovery fee shall be imposed only if the board has mailed its demand notice, to that person for payment, that advises that continued
 failure to pay the amount due may result in collection action, including the imposition of a collection cost recovery fee.

(b) Interest shall not accrue with respect to the collection cost recovery fee provided by this section.

(c) The collection cost recovery fee imposed pursuant to this section shall be collected in the same manner as the collection of any other tax imposed by this part.

(d) (1) If the board finds that a person’s failure to pay any amount under this part is due to reasonable cause and circumstances beyond the person’s control, and occurred notwithstanding the exercise of ordinary care and the absence of willful neglect, the person shall be relieved of the collection cost recovery fee provided by this section.

(2) Any person seeking to be relieved of the collection cost recovery fee shall file with the board a statement under penalty of perjury setting forth the facts upon which the person bases the claim for relief.

(e) Subdivision (a) shall be operative with respect to a demand notice for payment which is mailed on or after January 1, 2011.

(f) Collection cost recovery fee revenues shall be deposited in the same manner as revenues derived from any other tax imposed by this part.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 721, Sec. 8.   (SB 858)   Effective October 19, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 5. Overpayments and Refunds [11551. - 11597.]



  ARTICLE 1. Claim for Refund [11551. - 11555.]

11551.

If the board determines that any amount, penalty, or interest has been paid more than once or has been erroneously or illegally collected or computed, the board shall set forth that fact in the records of the board and shall certify the amount collected in excess of the amount legally due and the person from whom it was collected or by whom paid. The excess amount collected or paid shall be credited by the board on any
 amounts then due and payable from the person from whom the excess amount was collected or by whom it was paid under this part, and the balance shall be refunded to the person, or his or her successors, administrators, or executors. Any proposed determination by the board pursuant to this section with respect to an amount in excess of fifty thousand dollars ($50,000) shall be available as a public record for at least 10 days prior to the effective date of that determination.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 351, Sec. 20.   (SB 947)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

11553.

No credit or refund shall be allowed after four years from December 10 of the year in which the assessment is made or after six months from the date of overpayment, whichever period expires the later, unless a written claim is filed with the board within such period.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1974, Ch. 54.)
-------------------------------------------

11553.5.

(a) The limitation period specified in Section 11553 shall be suspended during any period of a person’s life that the person is financially disabled.

(b) (1) For purposes of subdivision (a), a person is financially disabled if the person is unable to manage his or her financial affairs by reason of medically determinable physical or mental impairment of the person which can be expected to result in death or which has lasted or can be expected to last
 for a continuous period of not less than 12 months. A person shall not be considered to have an impairment unless proof of the existence thereof is furnished in the form and manner as the board may require.

(2) A person shall not be treated as financially disabled during any period that the person’s spouse or any other person is authorized to act on behalf of the person in financial matters.

(c) This section applies to periods of disability commencing before, on, or after the effective date of the act adding this section, but does not apply to any claim for refund that (without regard to this section) is barred by the operation or rule of law, including res judicata, as of the effective date of the act adding this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 1052, Sec. 21.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

11554.

The claim shall be in writing and shall state the specific grounds upon which it is founded.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 41.)
-------------------------------------------

11555.

Interest shall be paid upon the amount of any overpayment of tax at the adjusted annual rate established pursuant to Section 19521 upon the amount found to have been illegally collected from the date of payment of the amount to the date of allowance of credit on account of the overpayment or to a date preceding the date of the refund warrant by not more than 30 days, the date to be determined by the board from the first day of the month following the month the tax becomes due. The interest shall be paid:

(a) In the case of a refund, to the last day of the calendar month following the date upon which the person making the overpayment, if he or she has not already filed a claim, is notified by the board that a claim may be filed or the date upon which the claim is approved by the board, whichever date is the earlier.

(b) In the case of a credit, to the same date as that to which interest is computed on the tax or amount against which the credit is applied.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 1087, Sec. 41.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Suit for Refund [11571. - 11577.]

11571.

No injunction or writ of mandate or other legal or equitable process shall issue in any suit, action, or proceeding in any court against this State or against any officer of the State to prevent or enjoin under this part the assessment of property or the collection of any amount required to be collected.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 41.)
-------------------------------------------

11572.

No suit or proceeding shall be maintained in any court for the recovery of any amount alleged to have been erroneously or illegally assessed or collected unless a claim for refund or credit has been duly filed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1957, Ch. 808.)
-------------------------------------------

11573.

Within 90 days after the mailing of the notice of the board’s action upon a claim for refund or credit, the claimant may bring an action against the board on the grounds set forth in the claim in a court of competent jurisdiction in any city or city and county of this State in which the Attorney General has an office for the recovery of the whole or any part of the amount with respect to which the claim has been disallowed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1957, Ch. 808.)
-------------------------------------------

11574.

If the board fails to mail notice of action on a claim within six months after the claim is filed, the claimant may, prior to the mailing of notice by the board, consider the claim disallowed and bring an action against the board on the grounds set forth in the claim for the recovery of the whole or any part of the amount claimed as an overpayment.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1957, Ch. 808.)
-------------------------------------------

11574.5.

Failure to bring suit or action within the time specified in this article constitutes a waiver of all demands against the State on account of any alleged overpayments.

(History: Added by Stats. 1957, Ch. 808.)
-------------------------------------------

11575.

If judgment is rendered for the plaintiff, the amount of the judgment shall first be credited on any amounts due from the plaintiff under this part, and the balance of the judgment shall be refunded to the plaintiff.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 41.)
-------------------------------------------

11576.

In any judgment, interest shall be allowed at the adjusted annual rate established pursuant to Section 19521 upon the amount found to have been illegally collected from the date of payment of the amount to the date of allowance of credit on account of the judgment or to a date preceding the date of the refund warrant by not more than 30 days, the date to be determined by the board.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 1087, Sec. 42.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

11577.

A judgment shall not be rendered in favor of the plaintiff in any action brought against the board to recover any amount paid when the action is brought by or in the name of an assignee of the person who paid the amount.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1945, Ch. 501.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Cancellations [11596. - 11597.]

11596.

If any amount for taxes, penalty, and interest has been illegally determined either by the person filing the return or by the board, the board shall set forth that fact in its records, certify the amount determined to be in excess of the amount legally due and the person against whom the determination was made, and authorize the cancellation of the amount upon the records of the board. Any proposed determination by the
 board pursuant to this section with respect to an amount in excess of fifty thousand dollars ($50,000) shall be available as a public record for at least 10 days prior to the effective date of that determination.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 351, Sec. 21.   (SB 947)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

11597.

(a) Any penalty provided for in Section 11341, 11354, 11405, or 11430 may be canceled by the board upon a finding that (1) the failure to make a timely payment is due to reasonable cause and circumstances beyond the taxpayer’s control, and occurred notwithstanding the exercise of ordinary care and the absence of willful neglect, provided the principal payment is made within 30 days after the delinquency date, or (2) there was an inadvertent error in the amount of payment made by the taxpayer, provided the principal payment for the
 proper amount of tax due is made within 10 days after the notice of shortage is mailed by the board.

(b) Except as provided in subdivision (c), any taxpayer seeking cancellation of the penalty shall file with the board a petition for cancellation or refund within 20 days of payment of the principal amount of the tax or within 20 days after the board mails notice of the entry of the penalty, whichever date is later. The petition shall be accompanied by a statement under penalty of perjury setting forth the facts upon which the claim for relief is based.

(c) The board shall establish criteria that provides for efficient resolution of requests for relief pursuant to this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 1052, Sec. 21.3.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 6. Administration [11651. - 11657.]

11651.

The board shall enforce the provisions of this part and may prescribe, adopt, and enforce rules and regulations relating to the administration and enforcement of this part. The board may prescribe the extent to which any ruling or regulation shall be applied without retroactive effect.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 41.)
-------------------------------------------

11651.5.

If the board for any reason fails to complete the private railroad car tax assessments by the time specified in Section 11336, it may nevertheless complete them within the next calendar month. In such case there shall be added one calendar month to the dates specified in Sections 11337, 11338, 11401, 11404, and 11405. The board shall notify each assessee by mail at his address as it appears in the records of the board of the substituted dates during which the assessment may be examined, a petition for reassessment filed, and the tax paid without penalty.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1978, Ch. 1209.)
-------------------------------------------

11652.

Every person whose property is subject to tax under this part shall keep such records and other pertinent data with respect to the operation of his private railroad cars as the board requires. The board or its authorized representative may examine the records and data.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1978, Ch. 1209.)
-------------------------------------------

11653.

Every railroad company with lines in this state shall keep such records and other data with respect to the operation of private railroad cars over those lines and make such reports as the board requires. The company shall on demand make the records and data available to the board or its authorized representative.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1978, Ch. 1209.)
-------------------------------------------

11654.

Any person having private railroad cars in his possession or control in this state shall furnish such data concerning the cars as the board may request.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1978, Ch. 1209.)
-------------------------------------------

11655.

(a) Except as provided herein, all information and records relating to the business affairs of persons required to report to the board pursuant to this part shall be held secret by the board.

(b) The board shall disclose information and records to law enforcement agencies, grand juries, and other duly authorized legislative or administrative officials of the state pursuant to their authorization to examine such information and records.

(c) The board also may disclose information, records, and appraisal
 data relating to state assessment of private railroad companies whose cars operate in interstate commerce to tax officials of other states having duties corresponding to those described by this part. The disclosure shall be limited to instances in which there is a reciprocal exchange of information by the states in which the cars operate, and shall be made only pursuant to a written agreement between the agencies involved. The agreement shall provide that any request for information be in writing, shall specify the information to be exchanged, and shall require that any information furnished be used solely for tax administration purposes and otherwise shall be held secret. The request for information and any written material furnished pursuant to the request shall be open to inspection by the person to whom the information relates at the office of the board in Sacramento.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1465, Sec. 20.)
-------------------------------------------

11656.

(a) Except as otherwise provided by law, any person who is engaged in the business of preparing, or providing services in connection with the preparation of, returns under Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 11251) of this part, or any person who for compensation prepares any such return for any other person, and who knowingly or recklessly does either of the following, shall be guilty of a misdemeanor, and, upon conviction thereof, shall be fined not more than one thousand dollars ($1,000) or imprisoned no more than one year, or both,
 together with the costs of prosecution:

(1) Discloses any information furnished to him or her for, or in connection with, the preparation of the return.

(2) Uses that information for any purpose other than to prepare, or assist in preparing, the return.

(b) Subdivision (a) shall not apply to disclosure of information if that disclosure is made pursuant to the person’s consent or pursuant to a subpoena, court order, or other compulsory legal process.

(History: Added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 1052, Sec. 21.5.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

11657.

(a) Every taxpayer is entitled to be reimbursed for any reasonable fees and expenses related to a hearing before the board if all of the following conditions are met:

(1) The taxpayer files a claim for the fee and expenses with the board within one year of the date the decision of the board becomes final.

(2) The board, in its sole discretion, finds that the action taken by the board staff was unreasonable.

(3) The board decides that the taxpayer be awarded a specific amount of fees and expenses related to the hearing, in an amount determined by the board in its sole discretion.

(b) To determine whether the board staff has been unreasonable, the board shall consider whether the board staff has established that its position was substantially justified.

(c) The amount of reimbursed fees and expenses shall be limited to the following:

(1) Fees and expenses incurred after the date of the notice of determination, jeopardy determination, or denial of a claim for refund.

(2) If the board finds that the staff was unreasonable with respect to certain issues but reasonable with respect to other issues,
 the amount of reimbursed fees and expenses shall be limited to those which relate to the issues where the staff was unreasonable.

(d) Any proposed award by the board pursuant to this section shall be available as a public record for at least 10 days prior to the effective date of the award.

(e) The amendments to this section by the act adding this subdivision shall be operative for claims filed on or after January 1, 2001.

(History: Added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 1052, Sec. 21.7.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 7. Disposition of Proceeds [11701. - 11702.]

11701.

All money received by the board under this part shall be transmitted to the State Treasurer and shall be deposited in the State Treasury to the credit of the General Fund.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 41.)
-------------------------------------------

11702.

The money so deposited, or so much thereof as may be necessary, is hereby appropriated for the purpose of making refunds under this part and shall, upon warrant of the Controller, be withdrawn from the State Treasury for such purpose.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 41.)
-------------------------------------------



PART 6.7. DOCUMENTARY TRANSFER TAX ACT [11901. - 11935.]



  CHAPTER 1. General Provisions and Definitions [11901. - 11903.]

11901.

This act is known and may be cited as the “Documentary Transfer Tax Act.”

(History: Amended by Stats. 1968, Ch. 17.)
-------------------------------------------

11902.

“County” shall include a city and county.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 11903 by Stats. 1968, Ch. 17.)
-------------------------------------------

11903.

“Recorder” means the recorder of a county.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 11904 by Stats. 1968, Ch. 17.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2. Authorization for Tax [11911. - 11913.]

11911.

(a) The board of supervisors of any county or city and county, by an ordinance adopted pursuant to this part, may impose, on each deed, instrument, or writing by which any lands, tenements, or other realty sold within the county shall be granted, assigned, transferred, or otherwise conveyed to, or vested in, the purchaser or purchasers, or any other person or persons, by his or their direction, when the consideration or value of the interest or property conveyed (exclusive of the value of any lien or encumbrance remaining thereon at the time of sale) exceeds one hundred dollars ($100) a tax at the rate of fifty-five cents ($0.55) for each five hundred
 dollars ($500) or fractional part thereof.
